Hawaii statutes.
§353-65 Paroles; rules. The Hawaii
paroling authority may establish rules, with the approval of the governor and
the director of public safety not inconsistent with this part, under which any
prisoner may be paroled but shall remain, while on parole, in the legal custody
and under the control of the paroling authority, and be subject, at any time
until the expiration of the term for which the prisoner was sentenced, to be
taken back within the enclosure of the prison. The rules shall have the force
and effect of law. Full power, subject to this part, to enforce the rules, to
grant, and to revoke paroles is conferred upon the paroling authority. The
power to retake and reimprison a paroled prisoner is conferred upon the
administrative secretary or the administrative secretary's designee, who may
issue a warrant authorizing all of the officers named therein to arrest and
return to actual custody any paroled prisoner. The superintendent of Hawaii
state prison, the chief of police of each county and all police officers of the
State or of any county, and all prison officers shall execute any such order in
like manner as ordinary criminal process.

If any prisoner so paroled leaves the State
without permission from the paroling authority, the prisoner shall be deemed to
be an escaped prisoner, and may be arrested as such. [L 1917, c 103, §2; RL
1925, §1561; am L 1931, c 126, §2; am L 1932 1st, c 17, §8; RL 1935, §6454; am
L 1939, c 203, pt of §6; RL 1945, §3959; RL 1955, §83-64; am L 1957, c 308, §1;
am L 1963, c 34, §§1, 2; am L 1965, c 96, §57; HRS §353-65; am L 1969, c 208,
§1; am L 1976, c 92, pt of §8; gen ch 1985; am L 1987, c 338, §10; am L 1989, c
211, §8; am L 2003, c 7, §1]

Cross References

Rulemaking, see chapter 91.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next